Washington statutes.
RCW 32.04.082

Pension, retirement, or health insurance benefits—Waiver by bank of offsets attributable to social security.

With respect to pension payments or retirement or health insurance benefits payable by a mutual savings bank to any employee heretofore or hereafter retired, such bank may waive all or any part of any offsets thereto attributable to social security benefits receivable by such employee.

[ 1999 c 14 s 15; 1957 c 80 s 7.]